California statutes. Penal Code
(1) “Demonstration mode” means that the programming or settings of a slot machine or device have been programmed, set, or selected to operate normally, but to not accept or pay out cash or any other consideration.

(2) “Slot machine or device” has the same meaning as “slot machine or device” as defined in Section 330.1, or “gambling device” as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1171 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

330.11.

“Banking game” or “banked game” does not include a controlled game if the published rules of the game feature a player-dealer position and provide that this position must be continuously and systematically rotated amongst each of the participants during the play of the game, ensure that the player-dealer is able to win or lose only a fixed and limited wager during the play of the game, and preclude the house, another entity, a player, or an observer from maintaining or operating as a bank during the course of the game. For purposes of this section it is not the intent of the Legislature to mandate acceptance of the deal by every player if the division finds that the rules of the game render the maintenance of or operation of a bank impossible by other means. The house shall not occupy the player-dealer position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

331.

Every person who knowingly permits any of the games mentioned in Sections 330 and 330a to be played, conducted, or dealt in any house owned or rented by such person, in whole or in part, is punishable as provided in Sections 330 and 330a.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

332.

(a) Every person who by the game of “three card monte,” so-called, or any other game, device, sleight of hand, pretensions to fortune telling, trick, or other means whatever, by use of cards or other implements or instruments, or while betting on sides or hands of any play or game, fraudulently obtains from another person money or property of any description, shall be punished as in the case of larceny of property of like value for the first offense, except that the fine may not exceed more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). A second offense of this section is punishable, as in the case of larceny, except that the fine shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both imprisonment and fine.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “fraudulently obtains” includes, but is not limited to, cheating, including, for example, gaining an unfair advantage for any player in any game through a technique or device not sanctioned by the rules of the game.

(c) For the purposes of establishing the value of property under this section, poker chips, tokens, or markers have the monetary value assigned to them by the players in any game.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 546, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

333.

Every person duly summoned as a witness for the prosecution, on any proceedings had under this Chapter, who neglects or refuses to attend, as required, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

334.

(a) Every person who owns or operates any concession, and who fraudulently obtains money from another by means of any hidden mechanical device or obstruction with intent to diminish the chance of any patron to win a prize, or by any other fraudulent means, shall be punished as in the case of theft of property of like value.

(b) Any person who manufactures or sells any mechanical device or obstruction for a concession which he knows or reasonably should know will be fraudulently used to diminish the chance of any patron to win a prize is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Any person who owns or operates any game, at a fair or carnival of a type known as razzle-dazzle is guilty of a misdemeanor.

As used in this subdivision, “razzle-dazzle” means a series of games of skill or chance in which the player pays money or other valuable consideration in return for each opportunity to make successive attempts to obtain points by the use of dice, darts, marbles or other implements, and where such points are accumulated in successive games by the player toward a total number of points, determined by the operator, which is required for the player to win a prize or other valuable consideration.

(d) As used in this section, “concession” means any game or concession open to the public and operated for profit in which the patron pays a fee for participating and may receive a prize upon a later happening.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or preempt more restrictive regulation of any concession at a fair or carnival by any local governmental entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 626.)
-------------------------------------------

335.

Every district attorney, sheriff, or police officer must inform against and diligently prosecute persons whom they have reasonable cause to believe offenders against the provisions of this chapter, and every officer refusing or neglecting so to do, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

335a.

In addition to any other remedy provided by law any machine or other device the possession or control of which is penalized by the laws of this State prohibiting lotteries or gambling may be seized by any peace officer, and a notice of intention summarily to destroy such machine or device as provided in this section must be posted in a conspicuous place upon the premises in or upon which such machine or device was seized. Such machine or device shall be held by such officer for 30 days after such posting, and if no action is commenced to recover possession of such machine or device, within such time, the same shall be summarily destroyed by such officer, or if such machine or device shall be held by the court, in any such action, to be in violation of such laws, or any of them, the same shall be summarily destroyed by such officer immediately after the decision of the court has become final.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction of any such actions or proceedings commenced to recover the possession of such machine or device or any money seized in connection therewith.

Any and all money seized in or in connection with such machine or device shall, immediately after such machine or device has been so destroyed, be paid into the treasury of the city or county, as the case may be, where seized, said money to be deposited in the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

336.

Every owner, lessee, or keeper of any house used in whole, or in part, as a saloon or drinking place, who knowingly permits any person under 18 years of age to play at any game of chance therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

336.5.

Gaming chips may be used on the gaming floor by a patron of a gambling establishment, as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 19805 of the Business and Professions Code, to pay for food and beverage items that are served at the table.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 123.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

336.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 337a, and except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who, not for gain, hire, or reward other than that at stake under conditions available to every participant, knowingly participates in any of the ways specified in paragraph (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 337a in any bet, bets, wager, wagers, or betting pool or pools made between the person and any other person or group of persons who are not acting for gain, hire, or reward, other than that at stake under conditions available to every participant, upon the result of any lawful trial, or purported trial, or contest, or purported contest, of skill, speed, or power of endurance of person or animal, or between persons, animals, or mechanical apparatus, is guilty of an
 infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to either of the following situations:

(1) Any bet, bets, wager, wagers, or betting pool or pools made online.

(2) Betting pools with more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) at stake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 155.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

337.

Every state, county, city, city and county, town, or judicial district officer, or other person who shall ask for, receive, or collect any money, or other valuable consideration, either for his own or the public use, for and with the understanding that he will aid, exempt, or otherwise assist any person from arrest or conviction for a violation of Section 330 of the Penal Code; or who shall issue, deliver, or cause to be given or delivered to any person or persons, any license, permit, or other privilege, giving, or pretending to give, any authority or right to any person or persons to carry on, conduct, open, or cause to be opened, any game or games which are forbidden or prohibited by Section 330 of said code; and any of such officer or officers who shall vote for the passage of any ordinance or by-law, giving, granting, or pretending to give or grant to any person or persons any authority or privilege to open, carry on, conduct, or cause to be opened, carried on, or conducted, any game or games prohibited by said Section 330 of the Penal Code, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1608.)
-------------------------------------------

337a.

(a) Except as provided in Section 336.9, every person who engages in one of the following offenses, shall be punished for a first offense by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year or in the state prison, or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both imprisonment and fine:

(1) Pool selling or bookmaking, with or without writing, at any time or place.

(2) Whether for gain, hire, reward, or gratuitously, or otherwise,
 keeps or occupies, for any period of time whatsoever, any room, shed, tenement, tent, booth, building, float, vessel, place, stand or enclosure, of any kind, or any part thereof, with a book or books, paper or papers, apparatus, device or paraphernalia, for the purpose of recording or registering any bet or bets, any purported bet or bets, wager or wagers, any purported wager or wagers, selling pools, or purported pools, upon the result, or purported result, of any trial, purported trial, contest, or purported contest, of skill, speed or power of endurance of person or animal, or between persons, animals, or mechanical apparatus, or upon the result, or purported result, of any lot, chance, casualty, unknown or contingent event whatsoever.

(3) Whether for gain, hire, reward, or gratuitously, or otherwise, receives, holds, or forwards, or purports or pretends to receive, hold, or forward, in any manner whatsoever, any money, thing or
 consideration of value, or the equivalent or memorandum thereof, staked, pledged, bet or wagered, or to be staked, pledged, bet or wagered, or offered for the purpose of being staked, pledged, bet or wagered, upon the result, or purported result, of any trial, or purported trial, or contest, or purported contest, of skill, speed or power of endurance of person or animal, or between persons, animals, or mechanical apparatus, or upon the result, or purported result, of any lot, chance, casualty, unknown or contingent event whatsoever.

(4) Whether for gain, hire, reward, or gratuitously, or otherwise, at any time or place, records, or registers any bet or bets, wager or wagers, upon the result, or purported result, of any trial, or purported trial, or contest, or purported contest, of skill, speed or power of endurance of person or animal, or between persons, animals, or mechanical apparatus, or upon the result, or purported result, of any lot,
 chance, casualty, unknown or contingent event whatsoever.

(5) Being the owner, lessee or occupant of any room, shed, tenement, tent, booth, building, float, vessel, place, stand, enclosure or grounds, or any part thereof, whether for gain, hire, reward, or gratuitously, or otherwise, permits that space to be used or occupied for any purpose, or in any manner prohibited by paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4).

(6) Lays, makes, offers or accepts any bet or bets, or wager or wagers, upon the result, or purported result, of any trial, or purported trial, or contest, or purported contest, of skill, speed or power of endurance of person or animal, or between persons, animals, or mechanical apparatus.

(b) In any accusatory pleading charging a violation of this section, if the defendant has been once previously convicted of a
 violation of any subdivision of this section, the previous conviction shall be charged in the accusatory pleading, and, if the previous conviction is found to be true by the jury, upon a jury trial, or by the court, upon a court trial, or is admitted by the defendant, the defendant shall, if he or she is not imprisoned in the state prison, be imprisoned in the county jail for a period of not more than one year and pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a court from placing a person subject to this subdivision on probation. However, that person shall be required to pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or be imprisoned in the county jail for a period of not more than one year, as a condition thereof. In no event does the court have the power to absolve a person convicted pursuant to this subdivision from either being imprisoned or from
 paying a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(c) In any accusatory pleading charging a violation of this section, if the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times of a violation of any subdivision of this section, each previous conviction shall be charged in the accusatory pleadings. If two or more of the previous convictions are found to be true by the jury, upon a jury trial, or by the court, upon a court trial, or are admitted by the defendant, the defendant shall, if he or she is not imprisoned in the state prison, be imprisoned in the county jail for a period of not more than one year or pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or be punished by both imprisonment and fine. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a court from placing a person subject to this subdivision on probation. However,
 that person shall be required to pay a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or be imprisoned in the county jail for a period of not more than one year as a condition thereof. In no event does the court have the power to absolve a person convicted and subject to this subdivision from either being imprisoned or from paying a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(d) Except where the existence of a previous conviction of any subdivision of this section was not admitted or not found to be true pursuant to this section, or the court finds that a prior conviction was invalid, the court shall not strike or dismiss any prior convictions alleged in the information or indictment.

(e) This section applies not only to persons who commit any of the acts designated in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of
 subdivision (a), as a business or occupation, but also applies to every person who in a single instance engages in any one of the acts specified in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   (AB 58)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

337b.

Any person who gives, or offers or promises to give, or attempts to give or offer, any money, bribe, or thing of value, to any participant or player, or to any prospective participant or player, in any sporting event, contest, or exhibition of any kind whatsoever, except a wrestling exhibition as defined in Section 18626 of the Business and Professions Code, and specifically including, but without being limited to, such sporting events, contests, and exhibitions as baseball, football, basketball, boxing, horse racing, and wrestling matches, with the intention or understanding or agreement that such participant or player or such prospective participant or player shall not use his or her best efforts to win such sporting event, contest, or exhibition, or shall so conduct
 himself or herself in such sporting event, contest, or exhibition that any other player, participant or team of players or participants shall thereby be assisted or enabled to win such sporting event, contest, or exhibition, or shall so conduct himself or herself in such sporting event, contest, or exhibition as to limit his or her or his or her team’s margin of victory in such sporting event, contest, or exhibition, is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 328.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

337c.

Any person who accepts, or attempts to accept, or offers to accept, or agrees to accept, any money, bribe or thing of value, with the intention or understanding or agreement that he or she will not use his or her best efforts to win any sporting event, contest, or exhibition of any kind whatsoever, except a wrestling exhibition as defined in Section 18626 of the Business and Professions Code, and specifically including, but without being limited to, such sporting events, contests, or exhibitions as baseball, football, basketball, boxing, horse racing, and wrestling matches, in which he or she is playing or participating or is about to play or participate in, or will so conduct himself or herself in such sporting event, contest, or exhibition that any other player or
 participant or team of players or participants shall thereby be assisted or enabled to win such sporting event, contest, or exhibition, or will so conduct himself or herself in such sporting event, contest, or exhibition as to limit his or her or his or her team’s margin of victory in such sporting event, contest, or exhibition, is guilty of a felony, and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 329.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

337d.

Any person who gives, offers to give, promises to give, or attempts to give, any money, bribe, or thing of value to any person who is umpiring, managing, directing, refereeing, supervising, judging, presiding, or officiating at, or who is about to umpire, manage, direct, referee, supervise, judge, preside, or officiate at any sporting event, contest, or exhibition of any kind whatsoever, including, but not limited to, sporting events, contests, and exhibitions such as baseball, football, boxing, horse racing, and wrestling matches, with the intention or agreement or understanding that the person shall corruptly or dishonestly umpire, manage, direct, referee, supervise, judge, preside, or officiate at, any sporting event, contest, or exhibition, or the players or
 participants thereof, with the intention or purpose that the result of the sporting event, contest, or exhibition will be affected or influenced thereby, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment and fine. A second offense of this section is a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 330.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

337e.

Any person who as umpire, manager, director, referee, supervisor, judge, presiding officer or official receives or agrees to receive, or attempts to receive any money, bribe or thing of value, with the understanding or agreement that such umpire, manager, director, referee, supervisor, judge, presiding officer, or official shall corruptly conduct himself or shall corruptly umpire, manage, direct, referee, supervise, judge, preside, or officiate at, any sporting event, contest, or exhibition of any kind whatsoever, and specifically including, but without being limited to, such sporting events, contests, and exhibitions as baseball, football, boxing, horse racing, and wrestling matches, or any player or participant thereof, with the intention or purpose that the result of
 the sporting event, contest, or exhibition will be affected or influenced thereby, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 331.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

337f.

(a) Any person who does any of the following is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both that fine and imprisonment:

(1) Influences, or induces, or conspires with, any owner, trainer, jockey, groom, or other person associated with or interested in any stable, horse, or race in which a horse participates, to affect the result of that race by stimulating or depressing a horse through the administration of any drug to that horse, or by the use of any electrical device or any electrical equipment or by any mechanical or other
 device not generally accepted as regulation racing equipment, or so stimulates or depresses a horse.

(2) Knowingly enters any horse in any race within a period of 24 hours after any drug has been administered to that horse for the purpose of increasing or retarding the speed of that horse.

(3) Willfully or unjustifiably enters or races any horse in any running or trotting race under any name or designation other than the name or designation assigned to that horse by and registered with the Jockey Club or the United States Trotting Association or willfully sets on foot, instigates, engages in or in any way furthers any act by which any horse is entered or raced in any running or trotting race under any name or designation other than the name or designation duly assigned by and registered with the Jockey Club or the United States Trotting Association.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “drug” includes all substances recognized as having the power of stimulating or depressing the central nervous system, respiration, or blood pressure of an animal, such as narcotics, hypnotics, benzedrine or its derivatives, but shall not include recognized vitamins or supplemental feeds approved by or in compliance with the rules and regulations or policies of the California Horse Racing Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 332.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

337g.

The possession, transport or use of any local anaesthetic of the cocaine group, including but not limited to natural or synthetic drugs of this group, such as allocaine, apothesine, alypine, benzyl carbinol, butyn, procaine, nupercaine, beta-eucaine, novol or anestubes, within the racing inclosure is prohibited, except upon a bona fide veterinarian’s prescription with complete statement of uses and purposes of same on the container. A copy of such prescription shall be filed with the stewards, and such substances may be used only with approval of the stewards and under the supervision of the veterinarian representing the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 1001.)
-------------------------------------------

337h.

Any person who, except for medicinal purposes, administers any poison, drug, medicine, or other noxious substance, to any horse, stud, mule, ass, mare, horned cattle, neat cattle, gelding, colt, filly, dog, animals, or other livestock, entered or about to be entered in any race or upon any race course, or entered or about to be entered at or with any agricultural park, or association, race course, or corporation, or other exhibition for competition for prize, reward, purse, premium, stake, sweepstakes, or other reward, or who exposes any poison, drug, medicine, or noxious substance, with intent that it shall be taken, inhaled, swallowed, or otherwise received by any of these animals or other livestock, with intent to impede or affect its speed, endurance, sense, health, physical condition, or other character or quality, or who causes to be taken by or placed upon or in the body of any of these animals or other livestock, entered or about to be entered in any race or competition described in this section any sponge, wood, or foreign substance of any kind, with intent to impede or affect its speed, endurance, sense, health, or physical condition, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

337i.

Every person who knowingly transmits information as to the progress or results of a horserace, or information as to wagers, betting odds, changes in betting odds, post or off times, jockey or player changes in any contest or trial, or purported contest or trial, involving humans, beasts, or mechanical apparatus by any means whatsoever including, but not limited to telephone, telegraph, radio, and semaphore when such information is transmitted to or by a person or persons engaged in illegal gambling operations, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year or in the state prison.

This section shall not be construed as prohibiting a newspaper from printing such results or information as news, or any television or radio station from telecasting or broadcasting such results or information as news. This section shall not be so construed as to place in jeopardy any common carrier or its agents performing operations within the scope of a public franchise, or any gambling operation authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

337j.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, as owner, lessee, or employee, whether for hire or not, either solely or in conjunction with others, to do any of the following without having first procured and thereafter maintained in effect all federal, state, and local licenses required by law:

(1) To deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain, or expose for play in this state any controlled game.

(2) To receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation or reward or any percentage or share of the revenue, for keeping, running, or carrying on any controlled game.

(3) To manufacture, distribute, or repair any gambling equipment within the boundaries of this state, or to receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation or reward for the manufacture, distribution, or repair of any gambling equipment within the boundaries of this state.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly permit any controlled game to be conducted, operated, dealt, or carried on in any house or building or other premises that he or she owns or leases, in whole or in part, if that activity is undertaken by a person who is not licensed as required by state law, or by an employee of that person.

(c) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly permit any gambling equipment to be manufactured, stored, or repaired in any house or building or other premises that the person owns or leases, in whole or in part, if that activity is undertaken by a person who is not licensed as required by state law, or by an employee of that person.

(d) Any person who violates, attempts to violate, or conspires to violate this section shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. A second offense of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year or in the state prison or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine.

(e) (1) As used in this section, “controlled game” means any poker or Pai Gow game, and any other game played with cards or tiles, or both, and approved by the Department of Justice, and any game of chance, including any gambling device, played for currency, check, credit, or any other thing of value that is not prohibited and made unlawful by statute or local ordinance.

(2) As used in this section, “controlled game” does not include any of the following:

(A) The game of bingo conducted pursuant to Section 326.3 or 326.5.

(B) Parimutuel racing on horse races regulated by the California Horse Racing Board.

(C) Any lottery game conducted by the California State Lottery.

(D) Games played with cards in private homes or residences, in which no person makes money for operating the game, except as a player.

(f) This subdivision is intended to be dispositive of the law relating to the collection of player fees in gambling establishments. A fee may not be calculated as a fraction or percentage of wagers made or winnings earned. The amount of fees charged for all wagers shall be determined prior to the start of play of any hand or round. However, the gambling establishment may waive collection of the fee or portion of the fee in any hand or round of play after the hand or round has begun pursuant to the published rules of the game and the notice provided to the public. The actual collection of the fee may occur before or after the start of play. Ample notice shall be provided to the patrons of gambling establishments relating to the assessment of fees. Flat fees on each wager may be assessed at different collection rates, but no more than five collection rates may be established per table. However, if the gambling establishment waives its collection fee, this fee does not constitute one of the five collection rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 748, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

337k.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to advertise, or to facilitate the advertisement of, nonparimutuel wagering on horse races.

(b) Violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500). A second conviction for a violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

337o.

(a) It is unlawful for any person or entity to operate, conduct, or offer an online sweepstakes game in this state.

(b) It is unlawful for any entity, financial institution, payment processor, geolocation provider, gaming content supplier, platform provider, or media affiliate to knowingly and willfully support directly or indirectly the operation, conduct, or promotion of an online sweepstakes game within this state.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Direct consideration” means a coin, token, or other representation of value that may be purchased by a player or received through a bonus or promotion and that is used for playing or participating in the online sweepstakes game.

(2) “Indirect consideration” means a coin, token, or other representation of value that may be exchanged for a prize, award, cash, or cash equivalents or a chance to win a prize, award, cash, or cash equivalents. Indirect consideration is provided for free through a promotion, bonus, or with the purchase of a related product, service, or activity. As used in this paragraph, “related product, service, or activity” includes a coin, token, or other representation of value that may be used for direct consideration.

(3) “Online sweepstakes game” means a game, contest, or promotion that meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Available on the internet or accessible on a mobile phone, computer terminal, or similar device.

(B) Utilizes a dual-currency system of payment that allows a person to play or participate with direct consideration or indirect consideration, and for which the person playing or participating may become eligible for a prize, award, cash, or cash equivalents or a chance to win a prize, award, cash, or cash equivalents.

(C) Simulates
 gambling, which, for purposes of this section, includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Slot machines.

(ii) Video poker.

(iii) Table games, including, but not limited to, blackjack, roulette, craps, and poker.

(iv) Lotteries, as defined in Section 319.

(v) Bingo.

(vi) Sports wagering.

(D) Awards cash or cash equivalents.

(d) A person who violates this section
 is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(e) This section does not make unlawful or otherwise restrict lawful games and methods used by a gambling enterprise licensed under the Gambling Control Act or operations of the California State Lottery.

(f) This section does not make unlawful game promotions or sweepstakes conducted by for-profit commercial entities on a limited and occasional basis as an advertising and marketing tool that are incidental
 to substantial bona fide sales of consumer products or services and that are not intended to provide a vehicle for the establishment of ongoing gambling or gaming.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 623, Sec. 3.   (AB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

337s.

(a) This section applies only in counties with a population exceeding 4,000,000.

(b) Every person who deals, plays, or carries on, opens, or causes to be opened, or who conducts, either as owner or employee, whether for hire or not, any game of draw poker, including lowball poker, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall become operative in a county only if the board of supervisors thereof by resolution directs that there be placed on the ballot at a designated county election the question whether draw poker, including lowball poker, shall be prohibited in the county and a majority of electors voting thereon vote affirmatively. The question shall appear on the ballot in substantially the following form:

“Shall draw poker, including lowball poker, be prohibited in ____ County? Yes ____ No ____”

If a majority of electors voting thereon vote affirmatively, draw poker shall be prohibited in the unincorporated territory in the county.

(d) Any county ordinance in any county prohibiting, restricting, or regulating the playing of draw poker and other acts relating to draw poker shall not be superseded until, pursuant to subdivision (c), the electorate of the county determines that subdivision (b) shall be operative in the county.

(e) The Legislature finds that in counties with a large, concentrated population, problems incident to the playing of draw poker are, in part, qualitatively, as well as quantitatively, different from the problems in smaller counties.

The Legislature finds that counties with a population exceeding 4,000,000 constitute a special problem, and it is reasonable classification to adopt prohibitory legislation applicable only to such counties.

(f) If any provision of this section is held invalid, the entire section shall be invalid. The provisions of this section are not severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

337t.

The following definitions govern the construction of this section and Sections 337u, 337w, 337x, and 337y:

(a) “Associated equipment” means any equipment or mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic contrivance, component or machine used remotely or directly in connection with gaming or any game that would not otherwise be classified as a gaming device, including dice, playing cards, links which connect to progressive slot machines, equipment which affects the proper reporting of gross revenue, computerized systems for monitoring slot machines and devices for weighing or counting money.

(b) “Cashless wagering system” means a method of wagering and accounting in which the validity and value of a wagering instrument or wagering credits are determined, monitored, and retained by a computer that is operated and maintained by a licensee and that maintains a record of each transaction involving the wagering instrument or wagering credits, exclusive of the game or gaming device on which wagers are being made. The term includes computerized systems which facilitate electronic transfers of money directly to or from a game or gaming device.

(c) “Cheat” means to alter the normal elements of chance, method of selection, or criteria, excluding those alterations to the game generally done by the casino to provide variety to games and that are known, or should be known, by the wagering players, which determine any of the following:

(1) The result of a gambling game.

(2) The amount or frequency of payment in a gambling game.

(3) The value of a wagering instrument.

(4) The value of a wagering credit.

(d) “Drop box” means the box that serves as a repository for cash, chips, tokens, or other wagering instruments.

(e) “Gambling establishment” means any premises wherein or whereon any gaming is done.

(f) “Gambling game device” means any equipment or mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic contrivance, component or machine used remotely or directly in connection with gaming or any game which affects the result of a wager by determining win or loss. The term includes any of the following:

(1) A slot machine.

(2) A collection of two or more of the following components:

(A) An assembled electronic circuit which cannot be reasonably demonstrated to have any use other than in a slot machine.
